Washington statutes.
RCW 36.93.051

Appointment of board—Members—Terms—Qualifications.

The boundary review board in each county with a population of one million or more shall consist of eleven members chosen as follows:

(1) Four persons shall be appointed by the county appointing authority;

(2) Four persons shall be appointed by the mayors of the cities and towns located within the county; and

(3) Three persons shall be appointed by the board from nominees of special districts in the county.

The governor shall designate one initial appointee to serve a term of two years, and two initial appointees to serve terms of four years, if the appointments are made in an odd-numbered year, or one initial appointee to serve a term of one year, and two initial appointees to serve terms of three years, if the appointments are made in an even-numbered year, with the length of the term being calculated from the first day of February in the year the appointment was made.

The county appointing authority shall designate one of its initial appointees to serve a term of two years, and two of its initial appointees to serve terms of four years, if the appointments are made in an odd-numbered year, or one of its initial appointees to serve a term of one year, and two of its initial appointees to serve terms of three years, if the appointments are made in an even-numbered year, with the length of the term being calculated from the first day of February in the year the appointment was made.

The mayors making the initial city and town appointments shall designate two of their initial appointees to serve terms of two years, and one of their initial appointees to serve a term of four years, if the appointments are made in an odd-numbered year, or two of their initial appointees to serve terms of one year, and one of their initial appointees to serve a term of three years, if the appointments are made in an even-numbered year, with the length of the term being calculated from the first day of February in the year the appointment was made.

The board shall make two initial appointments from the nominees of special districts, with one appointee serving a term of four years and one initial appointee serving a term of two years, if the appointments are made in an odd-numbered year, or one initial appointee serving a term of three years and one initial appointee serving a term of one year if the appointments are made in an even-numbered year, with the length of the term being calculated from the first day of March in the year in which the appointment is made.

After the initial appointments, all appointees shall serve four-year terms.

No appointee may be an official or employee of the county or a governmental unit in the county, or a consultant or advisor on a contractual or regular retained basis of the county, any governmental unit in the county, or any agency or association thereof.

[ 2011 1st sp.s. c 21 s 23; 1991 c 363 s 93; 1989 c 84 s 17.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2011 1st sp.s. c 21: See note following RCW 72.23.025.

Purpose—Captions not law—1991 c 363: See notes following RCW 2.32.180.